Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 13.12.907.
Honorary trusts; trusts for pets.

Subject to (c) of this section, a trust may be performed by the trustee for 21 years but not longer, whether or not the terms of the trust contemplate a longer duration, if

the trust is for a specific lawful, noncharitable purpose or for a lawful, noncharitable purpose to be selected by the trustee; and

there is not a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary designated.

Except as otherwise provided by this subsection and (c) of this section, a trust for the care of a designated domestic or pet animal is valid. The trust terminates when a living animal is not covered by the trust. A governing instrument shall be liberally construed to bring the transfer within this subsection, to presume against the merely precatory or honorary nature of the disposition, and to carry out the general intent of the transferor. Extrinsic evidence is admissible in determining the transferor’s intent.

In addition to the provisions of (a) or (b) of this section, a trust covered by either of those subsections is subject to the following provisions:

except as expressly provided otherwise in the trust instrument, a portion of the principal or income may not be converted to the use of the trustee or to a use other than for the trust’s purposes or for the benefit of a covered animal;

upon termination, the trustee shall transfer the unexpended trust property in the following order:

as directed in the trust instrument;

if the trust was created in a nonresiduary clause in the transferor’s will or in a codicil to the transferor’s will, under the residuary clause in the transferor’s will; and

if a taker is not produced by the application of (A) or (B) of this paragraph, to the transferor’s heirs under AS

13.12.711

;

for the purposes of AS

13.12.707

, the residuary clause is treated as creating a future interest under the terms of a trust;

the intended use of the principal or income may be enforced by an individual designated for that purpose in the trust instrument or, if none, by an individual appointed by a court upon application to the court by an individual;

except as ordered by the court or required by the trust instrument, a filing, report, registration, periodic accounting, separate maintenance of funds, appointment, or fee is not required by reason of the existence of the fiduciary relationship of the trustee;

a court may reduce the amount of the property transferred, if it determines that amount substantially exceeds the amount required for the intended use; the amount of the reduction, if any, passes as unexpended trust property under (2) of this subsection;

if a trustee is not designated or a designated trustee is not willing or able to serve, a court shall name a trustee; a court may order the transfer of the property to another trustee, if required to assure that the intended use is carried out and if a successor trustee is not designated in the trust instrument or if a designated successor trustee does not agree to serve or is unable to serve; a court may also make other orders and determinations as are advisable to carry out the intent of the transferor and the purpose of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.912.
International will; validity.

Except as provided by AS

13.06.068

, a will is valid as regards form, irrespective of the place where the will is made, of the location of the assets, and of the nationality, domicile, or residence of the testator, if the will is made in the form of an international will complying with the requirements of AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

.

The invalidity of the will as an international will does not affect its formal validity as a will of another kind.

AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

do not apply to the form of testamentary dispositions made by two or more persons in one instrument.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.12.913.
International will; requirements.

The international will must be written. The will does not need to be written by the testator. The will may be written in any language, or by hand or other means.

The testator shall declare in the presence of two witnesses and of a person authorized to act in connection with international wills that the document is the testator’s will and that the testator knows the contents of the will. The testator does not need to inform the witnesses, or the authorized person, of the contents of the will.

In the presence of the witnesses, and of the authorized person, the testator shall sign the international will, or, if the testator has previously signed it, shall acknowledge the testator’s signature.

When the testator is unable to sign, the absence of the testator’s signature does not affect the validity of the international will if the testator indicates the reason for the testator’s inability to sign and the authorized person makes note of the reason on the will. In these cases, it is permissible for any other person present, including the authorized person or one of the witnesses, at the direction of the testator, to sign the testator’s name for the testator, if the authorized person makes note of this also on the will, but it is not required that a person sign the testator’s name for the testator.

The witnesses and the authorized person shall there and then attest the international will by signing in the presence of the testator.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.914.
International will; other points of form.

The signatures shall be placed at the end of the international will. If the will consists of several sheets, each sheet shall be signed by the testator or, if the testator is unable to sign, by the person signing on the testator’s behalf or, if a person is not signing on the testator’s behalf, by the authorized person. In addition, each sheet shall be numbered.

The date of the international will is the date of its signature by the authorized person. That date shall be noted at the end of the will by the authorized person.

The authorized person shall ask the testator whether the testator wishes to make a declaration concerning the safekeeping of the will. If so and at the express request of the testator the place where the testator intends to have the will kept shall be mentioned in the certificate provided for in AS

13.12.915

.

An international will executed in compliance with AS

13.12.913

is not invalid merely because it does not comply with this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.915.
International will; certificate.

The authorized person shall attach to the international will a certificate to be signed by the authorized person establishing that the requirements of
AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

for valid execution of an international will have been complied with. The authorized person shall keep a copy of the certificate and deliver another to the testator. The certificate shall be substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE (Convention of October 26, 1973) 1.
I, (name, address, and capacity), a person authorized to act in connection with international wills 2.
certify that on (date) at (place) 3.
(testator) (name, address, date, and place of birth) in my presence and that of the witnesses 4.
(a) (name, address, date, and place of birth) (b) (name, address, date, and place of birth) has declared that the attached document is the testator’s will and that the testator knows the contents of the will; 5.
I furthermore certify that: 6.
(a) in my presence and in that of the witnesses (1) the testator has signed the will or has acknowledged the testator’s signature previously affixed. * (2) following a declaration of the testator stating that the testator was unable to sign the testator’s will for the following reason , I have mentioned this declaration on the will *and the signature has been affixed by (name and address) 7.
(b) the witnesses and I have signed the will; 8.
* (c) each page of the will has been signed by and numbered; 9.
(d) I have satisfied myself as to the identity of the testator and of the witnesses as designated above; 10.
(e) the witnesses met the conditions requisite to act as witnesses according to the law under which I am acting; 11.
* (f) the testator has requested me to include the following statement concerning the safekeeping of the testator’s will: 12.
PLACE OF EXECUTION 13.
DATE 14.
SIGNATURE and, if necessary, SEAL * to be completed if appropriate.

Click to view

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.916.
International will; effect of certificate.

In the absence of evidence to the contrary, the certificate of the authorized person is conclusive of the formal validity of the instrument as an international will under AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

. The absence or irregularity of a certificate does not affect the formal validity of a will under AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.917.
International will; revocation.

An international will is subject to the ordinary rules of revocation of wills.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.918.
Source and construction.

AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.917

and

13.12.921

derive from the Annex to Convention of October 26, 1973, Providing a Uniform Law on the Form of an International Will. In interpreting and applying AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

, regard shall be had to its international origin and to the need for uniformity in its interpretation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.919.
Persons authorized to act in relation to international will; eligibility; recognition by authorizing agency.

Individuals who are licensed to practice law in this state and who are in good standing as active law practitioners in this state, are hereby declared to be authorized persons in relation to international wills.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.920.
International will information registration.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall establish a registry system by which authorized persons may register in a central information center information regarding the execution of international wills, keeping that information in strictest confidence until the death of the maker and then making it available to any person desiring information about any will who presents a death certificate or other satisfactory evidence of the testator’s death to the center. Information that may be received, preserved in confidence until death, and reported as indicated is limited to the testator’s name, social security, or other individual identifying number established by law, address, and date and place of birth, and the intended place of deposit or safekeeping of the instrument pending the death of the maker. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, at the request of the authorized person, may cause the information it receives about execution of an international will to be transmitted to the registry system of another jurisdiction as identified by the testator, if that other system adheres to rules protecting the confidentiality of the information similar to those established in this state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 13.12.921.
Definitions for AS 13.12.912 — 13.12.921.

In AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.921

,

“authorized person” and “person authorized to act in connection with international wills” mean a person who by AS

13.12.919

, or by the laws of the United States, including members of the diplomatic and consular service of the United States designated by federal regulations, is empowered to supervise the execution of international wills;

“international will” means a will executed in conformity with AS

13.12.912

—

13.12.915

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)